South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3801.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 11-35-710(A)(1) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (1) the transportation planning, construction, maintenance, operation, and repair of bridges, highways, and roads; , and other improvements on state's rights of way; vehicle and road equipment maintenance and repair; and other emergency-type parts or equipment utilized by the Department of Transportation or the Department of Public Safety. This exemption does not apply to welcome centers operated or staffed by the Department of Parks, Recreation and Tourism; SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----